Hawaii statutes.
§373C‑33 Personnel. The
department of labor and industrial relations may establish positions and hire
necessary personnel for the purposes of this part in accordance with chapter
76. [L 1983, c 193, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2006, c 300, §12]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next